Hawaii statutes.
[§159-24] Sanitation. The board shall
cause to be made by veterinarian or meat inspector, the inspection of all
slaughtering, meat-canning, salting, packing, rendering, or similar
establishments in which cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, and other
equines are slaughtered and the meat or meat products thereof are prepared
solely for intrastate commerce as may be necessary to inform itself concerning
the sanitary conditions of the same, and to prescribe the sanitation under
which the establishments shall be maintained; and where the sanitary conditions
of any establishments are such that the meat or meat products are rendered
adulterated, it shall refuse to allow the meat or meat products to be labeled,
marked, stamped, or tagged as "Hawaii Inspected and Passed". [L 1969,
c 214, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next